Ohio, session 136, HB716.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 3901.93 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 3901.93. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Health plan issuer" has the same meaning as in section 3922.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Payer" includes a health plan issuer, the medicaid program, and the medicare program. (B) Not later than one year after the effective date of this section, the superintendent of insurance shall establish and administer an all-payer claims database. To the extent permitted by federal law, each payer shall submit its claims to the superintendent for inclusion in the database. Such claims shall be submitted in the format and according to the schedule prescribed by the superintendent in rule. The superintendent shall include in the database each claim the superintendent receives. Claims information included in the database may be made available to persons or government entities only upon a subscription with the department of insurance. (C) The superintendent shall adopt rules to implement this section, including rules establishing standards and procedures for the following: (1) Submitting claims for inclusion in the database, including the prescribed format and schedule; (2) Maintaining the privacy and security of personal and health information contained in claims; (3) Making available to persons or government entities claims information from the database through subscriptions; (4) Imposing penalties when claims are not submitted. The superintendent may adopt any other rules the superintendent considers necessary to implement this section. All rules shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (D) Notwithstanding any provision of section 121.95 of the Revised Code to the contrary, a regulatory restriction contained in a rule adopted under division (C) of this section is not subject to sections 121.95 to 121.953 of the Revised Code.